District of Columbia statutes.
6-909

Appointment of guardian for person non compos mentis or for infant.

Whenever the title to any building or part of building is vested in a person non compos mentis, or a minor child or minor children without legal guardian, the Board for the Condemnation of Insanitary Buildings shall report that fact to the Mayor of the District of Columbia, who shall take due legal steps to secure the appointment of a guardian or guardians for such person non compos mentis, or minor child or children aforesaid, for the purpose of the condemnation proceedings authorized by this chapter, and any judge of the court having probate jurisdiction is hereby authorized to appoint a guardian or guardians for such purpose.

May 1, 1906, 34 Stat. 159, ch. 2073, § 9
Aug. 28, 1954, 68 Stat. 887, ch. 1032
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 577, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 158(e)

History

1981 Ed., § 5-709.
1973 Ed., § 5-624.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government